Missouri, session 2026, SB1085.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 167, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 167.172, to read as
follows:
167.172. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Biological sex", as defined in section 191.1720;
(2) "Gender transition", as defined in section
191.1720;
(3) "Parent", a parent, legal guardian, or other
person having charge, control, or custody of a student;
(4) "Public school", as defined in section 160.011.
The term shall be construed to include a charter school;
(5) "Social transition", the process of a minor
student changing his or her gender presentation or
expression, with the goal of such minor student being
perceived and treated as a gender different from the
student's biological sex, and which may involve social or
behavioral changes or changes to physical appearance,
including, but not limited to, the following:

SCS SB 1085 2
(a) The use of pronouns or titles for the minor
student that do not correspond to the student's biological
sex, either in school records or otherwise; or
(b) The use of names other than the student's legal
name, or a nickname or derivative thereof, either in school
records or otherwise;
(6) "Staff member", a teacher, school employee,
volunteer, contractor, or other individual authorized to
provide services at a public school, including, but not
limited to, any individual in a position of authority or
responsibility, such as a counselor or health care worker.
2. Each staff member of a public school:
(1) Shall not encourage or coerce a minor student to
withhold information from the minor student's parent;
(2) Shall not withhold from a minor student's parent
information that relates to the physical, emotional, or
mental health of the minor student;
(3) Shall notify a minor student's parent within
twenty-four hours of receiving any request by the minor
student to participate in or facilitate the social
transition of the minor student, including any request by
the minor student to:
(a) Be referred to by pronouns or titles that do not
correspond to the minor student's biological sex, either in
school records or otherwise;
(b) Be referred to using names other than the minor
student's legal name, or a nickname or derivative thereof,
either in school records or otherwise;
(c) Use restrooms, locker rooms, changing rooms, or
overnight lodging designated for the opposite biological
sex; or

SCS SB 1085 3
(d) Participate on an athletic team or any other sex-
separated school activity designated for the opposite
biological sex.
3. No staff member of any public school shall:
(1) Participate in or engage in any conduct that
facilitates the social transition of any minor student;
(2) Deliver any presentation or lesson to any minor
student regarding gender transition or social transition; or
(3) Refer to a minor student by a title or pronoun
that does not correspond to the student's biological sex, or
by a name other than the student's legal name or a nickname
or derivative thereof.
4. A staff member or student shall not be subject to
any disciplinary action or other adverse action for:
(1) Declining to address a person using a name other
than the person's legal name, or a derivative thereof, or by
a pronoun or title that is inconsistent with the person's
biological sex; or
(2) Declining to identify his or her pronouns.
5. Any public school staff member who discloses a
violation of this section by another staff member shall be
protected from any manner of retaliation as set forth in
section 105.055.
6. (1) If a school district discovers that a staff
member who holds a certificate of license to teach has
knowingly violated any provision of this section, the school
district shall initiate disciplinary proceedings against
that staff member, up to and including suspension or
revocation of the license and suspension or termination of
employment, as appropriate, based upon evidence of
incompetence, immorality, or neglect of duty, pursuant to
the provisions of section 168.071.

SCS SB 1085 4
(2) If a charter school discovers that a staff member
who holds a certificate of license to teach has knowingly
violated any provision of this section, the charter school
shall initiate disciplinary proceedings against that staff
member, up to and including suspension or termination of
employment, and may refer the matter to the department of
elementary and secondary education for the filing of charges
seeking to suspend or revoke the staff member's license
pursuant to subsection 3 of section 168.071, as appropriate.
7. The attorney general may bring a civil action,
including an action for injunctive relief, against a school
district, public school, or staff member for any violation
of this section. Such action shall be brought in the county
where the violation occurred.
8. Any parent of a minor student may bring a civil
action, including an action for injunctive relief or for
damages, against the staff member or against the school
district or public school in which such minor student is
enrolled for any violation of this section. Such action
shall be brought in the county where the violation
100 occurred. If the parent prevails, the court shall award to
101 such parent court costs and reasonable attorney's fees and
102 any other damages or remedy which in the judgment of the
103 court shall be appropriate.
104 9. Any staff member may bring a civil action,
105 including an action for injunctive relief or for damages,
106 against the school district or public school that employs
107 the staff member for any violation of subsection 4 or 5 of
108 this section. Such action shall be brought in the county
109 where the violation occurred. If the staff member prevails,
110 the court shall award to such staff member court costs and

SCS SB 1085 5
111 reasonable attorney's fees and any other damages or remedy
112 which in the judgement of the court shall be appropriate.
✓